Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB256.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 23A.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A direct appeal may be taken from District Court to Circuit Court from any final
action of the District Court.
(2) The Circuit Court may issue all writs necessary in aid of its appellate jurisdiction,
or the complete determination of any cause within its appellate jurisdiction.
(3) An appeal may be taken to the Circuit Court by the state in criminal cases from
an adverse decision or ruling of the District Court, but only under the following
conditions:
(a) The appeal shall not suspend the proceedings in the case;
(b) The appeal shall be taken in the manner provided by the Rules of Criminal
Procedure and the Rules of Appellate Procedure; and
(c) When an appeal is taken pursuant to this subsection, the Circuit Court, if
the record warrants, may reverse the decision of the District Court and
order a new trial in any case in which a new trial would not constitute
double jeopardy or otherwise violate any constitutional rights of the
defendant.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:30 AM Jacketed